Hawaii statutes.
§231-3.4 Publication of reports.
(a) The department of taxation shall publish reports on the following:

(1) Hawaii income patterns--individuals;

(2) Hawaii income patterns--businesses;

(3) Tax credits; and

(4) General excise tax exemptions that:

(A) Are tax expenditures at the wholesale
rate;

(B) Are tax expenditures at the retail rate;
and

(C) May be foregone opportunities to export
taxes;

provided that the department of taxation
shall have the discretion to determine the exemptions that fit within each of
the categories within subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) and those that do not fit
into any of the categories. The department shall not be required to publish
reports on exemptions that do not fit into any of the categories.

(b) The department shall make each of these
reports available in both paper form and commonly accessible electronic forms.

(c) The department of taxation shall provide
the reports required by subsection (a)(1) and (3) to the legislature no later
than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular session; provided that
on or before December 31, 2015, the department of taxation shall report to the
legislature on the status of upgrading its forms and reporting capabilities per
the implementation of the department of taxation's tax system modernization.
The department of taxation shall provide the reports required by subsection
(a)(2) and (4) to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the
convening of the 2017 regular session and each session thereafter.

(d) The department may explore and implement
all reasonable methods of covering the costs of distribution of the reports,
including but not limited to:

(1) Setting reasonable fees that will cover the costs
of producing and distributing the reports in paper and electronic form; and

(2) Negotiating licensing fees with commercial
information providers for rights to carry the reports on-line or in other
electronic storage methods. [L 1996, c 250, §2; am L 2012, c 189, §1; am L
2015, c 94, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next